Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.180

Enforceability of debts—Authority to offer degree required.

A note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness or contract relating to payment for education is not enforceable in the courts of this state by a private vocational school or holder of the instrument unless the private vocational school was licensed under this chapter at the time the note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness or contract was entered into.

[ 1986 c 299 s 18.]